Utah statutes.
31A-31-111.   Health discount program fraud.
(1)  In addition to any other fraudulent acts prohibited by this chapter, a
person commits a fraudulent insurance act if that person with intent to
deceive or defraud:
(a)   accepts fees, dues, charges, or other consideration for providing a
health discount program as defined in Section 31A-8a-102 without having health
care providers under contract who have agreed to provide the discounts
promised to enrollees; or
(b)  operates a health discount program without complying with the provisions
of Section 31A-8a-201.
(2)  In addition to any other civil penalties or remedies provided by law, a
person who violates this section is guilty of a third degree felony.
